static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG num
SFX 234 Y 323 # V глагол -өү
SFX 234 өү мә/239 . +Neg
SFX 234 өү мәгәндәр/116 . +Neg+Prc+Pl
SFX 234 өү мәгәндең/118 . +Neg+Prc+Gen
SFX 234 өү мәгәнгә/122 . +Neg+Prc+Dat
SFX 234 өү мәгәнгәрәк . +Neg+Prc+Dat+Comp
SFX 234 өү мәгәнде/122 . +Neg+Prc+Acc
SFX 234 өү мәгәндән/118 . +Neg+Prc+Abl
SFX 234 өү мәгәндә/122 . +Neg+Prc+Loc
SFX 234 өү мәгәндәрәк . +Neg+Prc+Loc+Comp
SFX 234 өү мәгәнмен/127 . +Neg+Prc+Pred1Sg
SFX 234 өү мәгәнһең/127 . +Neg+Prc+Pred2Sg
SFX 234 өү мәгәнбеҙ/131 . +Neg+Prc+Pred1Pl
SFX 234 өү мәгәнһегеҙ/131 . +Neg+Prc+Pred2Pl
SFX 234 өү мәгән/196 . +Neg+Prc
SFX 234 өү мәгәнме . +Neg+Prc+Q
SFX 234 өү мәгәнмелер . +Neg+Prc+Q+Indf
SFX 234 өү мәгәндер . +Neg+Prc+Indf
SFX 234 өү мәгәнсе . +Neg+Prc+Clt/сы
SFX 234 өү мәгәндеке/136 . +Neg+Prc+Poss
SFX 234 өү мәгәнкәй/140 . +Neg+Prc+Dim
SFX 234 өү мәгәндәй/142 . +Neg+Prc+Der/дай
SFX 234 өү мәгәнсә/144 . +Neg+Prc+Der/са
SFX 234 өү мәгәндәге/146 . +Neg+Prc+Der/дағы
SFX 234 өү мәгәнле/148 . +Neg+Prc+Der/лы
SFX 234 өү мәгәнһеҙ/152 . +Neg+Prc+Abe
SFX 234 өү мәгәнгәсә/156 . +Neg+Prc+Der/ҡаса
SFX 234 өү мәгәнерәк . +Neg+Prc+Comp
SFX 234 өү мәүселәр/116 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pl
SFX 234 өү мәүсенең/118 . +Neg+PrcPot+Gen
SFX 234 өү мәүсегә/122 . +Neg+PrcPot+Dat
SFX 234 өү мәүсегәрәк . +Neg+PrcPot+Dat+Comp
SFX 234 өү мәүсене/122 . +Neg+PrcPot+Acc
SFX 234 өү мәүсенән/118 . +Neg+PrcPot+Abl
SFX 234 өү мәүселә/122 . +Neg+PrcPot+Loc
SFX 234 өү мәүселәрәк . +Neg+PrcPot+Loc+Comp
SFX 234 өү мәүсемен/127 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pred1Sg
SFX 234 өү мәүсеһең/127 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pred2Sg
SFX 234 өү мәүсебеҙ/131 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pred1Pl
SFX 234 өү мәүсеһегеҙ/131 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pred2Pl
SFX 234 өү мәүсе/200 . +Neg+PrcPot
SFX 234 өү мәүсеме . +Neg+PrcPot+Q
SFX 234 өү мәүсемелер . +Neg+PrcPot+Q+Indf
SFX 234 өү мәүселер . +Neg+PrcPot+Indf
SFX 234 өү мәүсесе . +Neg+PrcPot+Clt/сы
SFX 234 өү мәүсенеке/136 . +Neg+PrcPot+Poss
SFX 234 өү мәүсекәй/140 . +Neg+PrcPot+Dim
SFX 234 өү мәүселәй/142 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/дай
SFX 234 өү мәүсесә/144 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/са
SFX 234 өү мәүселәге/146 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/дағы
SFX 234 өү мәүселе/148 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/лы
SFX 234 өү мәүсеһеҙ/152 . +Neg+PrcPot+Abe
SFX 234 өү мәүсегәсә/156 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/ҡаса
SFX 234 өү мәүсерәк . +Neg+PrcPot+Comp
SFX 234 өү мәүҙәр/116 . +Neg+Act+Pl
SFX 234 өү мәүҙең/118 . +Neg+Act+Gen
SFX 234 өү мәүгә/122 . +Neg+Act+Dat
SFX 234 өү мәүгәрәк . +Neg+Act+Dat+Comp
SFX 234 өү мәүҙе/122 . +Neg+Act+Acc
SFX 234 өү мәүҙән/118 . +Neg+Act+Abl
SFX 234 өү мәүҙә/122 . +Neg+Act+Loc
SFX 234 өү мәүҙәрәк . +Neg+Act+Loc+Comp
SFX 234 өү мәүмен/127 . +Neg+Act+Pred1Sg
SFX 234 өү мәүһең/127 . +Neg+Act+Pred2Sg
SFX 234 өү мәүбеҙ/131 . +Neg+Act+Pred1Pl
SFX 234 өү мәүһегеҙ/131 . +Neg+Act+Pred2Pl
SFX 234 өү мәү/196 . +Neg+Act
SFX 234 өү мәүме . +Neg+Act+Q
SFX 234 өү мәүмелер . +Neg+Act+Q+Indf
SFX 234 өү мәүҙер . +Neg+Act+Indf
SFX 234 өү мәүсе . +Neg+Act+Clt/сы
SFX 234 өү мәүҙеке/136 . +Neg+Act+Poss
SFX 234 өү мәүкәй/140 . +Neg+Act+Dim
SFX 234 өү мәүҙәй/142 . +Neg+Act+Der/дай
SFX 234 өү мәүсә/144 . +Neg+Act+Der/са
SFX 234 өү мәүҙәге/146 . +Neg+Act+Der/дағы
SFX 234 өү мәүле/148 . +Neg+Act+Der/лы
SFX 234 өү мәүһеҙ/152 . +Neg+Act+Abe
SFX 234 өү мәүгәсә/156 . +Neg+Act+Der/ҡаса
SFX 234 өү сө . +Clt/сы
SFX 234 өү ҙөм/243 . +Indc+PxSg1
SFX 234 өү ҙөң/243 . +Indc+PxSg2
SFX 234 өү ҙө/250 . +Indc+PxSg3
SFX 234 өү ҙөк/254 . +Indc+PxPl1
SFX 234 өү ҙөгөҙ/243 . +Indc+PxPl2
SFX 234 өү ҙөләр/245 . +Indc+PxPl3
SFX 234 өү гәнмен/241 . +Past+PxSg1
SFX 234 өү гәнһең/241 . +Past+PxSg2
SFX 234 өү гән/241,282 . +Past+PxSg3
SFX 234 өү гәндәр/116 . +Prc+Pl
SFX 234 өү гәндең/118 . +Prc+Gen
SFX 234 өү гәнгә/122 . +Prc+Dat
SFX 234 өү гәнгәрәк . +Prc+Dat+Comp
SFX 234 өү гәнде/122 . +Prc+Acc
SFX 234 өү гәндән/118 . +Prc+Abl
SFX 234 өү гәндә/122 . +Prc+Loc
SFX 234 өү гәндәрәк . +Prc+Loc+Comp
SFX 234 өү гәнмен/127 . +Prc+Pred1Sg
SFX 234 өү гәнһең/127 . +Prc+Pred2Sg
SFX 234 өү гәнбеҙ/131 . +Prc+Pred1Pl
SFX 234 өү гәнһегеҙ/131 . +Prc+Pred2Pl
SFX 234 өү гән/196 . +Prc
SFX 234 өү гәнме . +Prc+Q
SFX 234 өү гәнмелер . +Prc+Q+Indf
SFX 234 өү гәндер . +Prc+Indf
SFX 234 өү гәнсе . +Prc+Clt/сы
SFX 234 өү гәндеке/136 . +Prc+Poss
SFX 234 өү гәнкәй/140 . +Prc+Dim
SFX 234 өү гәндәй/142 . +Prc+Der/дай
SFX 234 өү гәнсә/144 . +Prc+Der/са
SFX 234 өү гәндәге/146 . +Prc+Der/дағы
SFX 234 өү гәнле/148 . +Prc+Der/лы
SFX 234 өү гәнһеҙ/152 . +Prc+Abe
SFX 234 өү гәнгәсә/156 . +Prc+Der/ҡаса
SFX 234 өү гәнерәк . +Prc+Comp
SFX 234 өү гәнбеҙ/241 . +Past+PxPl1
SFX 234 өү гәнһегеҙ/241 . +Past+PxPl2
SFX 234 өү гәндәр/245 . +Past+PxPl3
SFX 234 өү гәйнем/241 . +Plu+PxSg1
SFX 234 өү гәйнең/241 . +Plu+PxSg2
SFX 234 өү гәйне/248 . +Plu+PxSg3
SFX 234 өү гәйнек/252 . +Plu+PxPl1
SFX 234 өү гәйнегеҙ/241 . +Plu+PxPl2
SFX 234 өү гәйнеләр/245 . +Plu+PxPl3
SFX 234 өү әм/241 . +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 234 өү әмен/241 . +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 234 өү әһең/241 . +Pres+PxSg2
SFX 234 өү ә/248 . +Pres+PxSg3
SFX 234 өү әрәк . +Prc+Comp
SFX 234 өү әбеҙ/241 . +Pres+PxPl1
SFX 234 өү әһегеҙ/241 . +Pres+PxPl2
SFX 234 өү әләр/245 . +Pres+PxPl3
SFX 234 өү әсәкмен/241 . +Fut2+PxSg1
SFX 234 өү әсәкһең/241 . +Fut2+PxSg2
SFX 234 өү әсәк/252 . +Fut2+PxSg3
SFX 234 өү әсәктәр/116 . +Prc+Pl
SFX 234 өү әсәктең/118 . +Prc+Gen
SFX 234 өү әсәккә/122 . +Prc+Dat
SFX 234 өү әсәккәрәк . +Prc+Dat+Comp
SFX 234 өү әсәкте/122 . +Prc+Acc
SFX 234 өү әсәктән/118 . +Prc+Abl
SFX 234 өү әсәктә/122 . +Prc+Loc
SFX 234 өү әсәктәрәк . +Prc+Loc+Comp
SFX 234 өү әсәкмен/127 . +Prc+Pred1Sg
SFX 234 өү әсәкһең/127 . +Prc+Pred2Sg
SFX 234 өү әсәкбеҙ/131 . +Prc+Pred1Pl
SFX 234 өү әсәкһегеҙ/131 . +Prc+Pred2Pl
SFX 234 өү әсәк/207 . +Prc
SFX 234 өү әсәкме . +Prc+Q
SFX 234 өү әсәкмелер . +Prc+Q+Indf
SFX 234 өү әсәктер . +Prc+Indf
SFX 234 өү әсәксе . +Prc+Clt/сы
SFX 234 өү әсәктеке/136 . +Prc+Poss
SFX 234 өү әсәккәй/140 . +Prc+Dim
SFX 234 өү әсәктәй/142 . +Prc+Der/дай
SFX 234 өү әсәксә/144 . +Prc+Der/са
SFX 234 өү әсәктәге/146 . +Prc+Der/дағы
SFX 234 өү әсәкле/148 . +Prc+Der/лы
SFX 234 өү әсәкһеҙ/152 . +Prc+Abe
SFX 234 өү әсәккәсә/156 . +Prc+Der/ҡаса
SFX 234 өү әсәкерәк . +Prc+Comp
SFX 234 өү әсәкбеҙ/241 . +Fut2+PxPl1
SFX 234 өү әсәкһегеҙ/241 . +Fut2+PxPl2
SFX 234 өү әсәктәр/245 . +Fut2+PxPl3
SFX 234 өү һөн/258 . +Imp+PxSg3
SFX 234 өү өгөҙ/258 . +Imp+PxPl2
SFX 234 өү һөндәр/260 . +Imp+PxPl3
SFX 234 өү әйем/262 . +Opt+PxSg1
SFX 234 өү әйек/266 . +Opt+PxSg2
SFX 234 өү һәм/270 . +Cond+PxSg1
SFX 234 өү һәң/270 . +Cond+PxSg2
SFX 234 өү һә/274 . +Cond+PxSg3
SFX 234 өү һәк/276 . +Cond+PxPl1
SFX 234 өү һәгеҙ/270 . +Cond+PxPl2
SFX 234 өү һәләр/272 . +Cond+PxPl3
SFX 234 өү гәс/280 . +GerAfter
SFX 234 өү гәсерәк . +GerAfter+Comp
SFX 234 өү гәнсә/278 . +GerUntil
SFX 234 өү гәнсәрәк . +GerUntil+Comp
SFX 234 өү өүселәр/116 . +PrcPot+Pl
SFX 234 өү өүсенең/118 . +PrcPot+Gen
SFX 234 өү өүсегә/122 . +PrcPot+Dat
SFX 234 өү өүсегәрәк . +PrcPot+Dat+Comp
SFX 234 өү өүсене/122 . +PrcPot+Acc
SFX 234 өү өүсенән/118 . +PrcPot+Abl
SFX 234 өү өүселә/122 . +PrcPot+Loc
SFX 234 өү өүселәрәк . +PrcPot+Loc+Comp
SFX 234 өү өүсемен/127 . +PrcPot+Pred1Sg
SFX 234 өү өүсеһең/127 . +PrcPot+Pred2Sg
SFX 234 өү өүсебеҙ/131 . +PrcPot+Pred1Pl
SFX 234 өү өүсеһегеҙ/131 . +PrcPot+Pred2Pl
SFX 234 өү өүсе/200 . +PrcPot
SFX 234 өү өүсеме . +PrcPot+Q
SFX 234 өү өүсемелер . +PrcPot+Q+Indf
SFX 234 өү өүселер . +PrcPot+Indf
SFX 234 өү өүсесе . +PrcPot+Clt/сы
SFX 234 өү өүсенеке/136 . +PrcPot+Poss
SFX 234 өү өүсекәй/140 . +PrcPot+Dim
SFX 234 өү өүселәй/142 . +PrcPot+Der/дай
SFX 234 өү өүсесә/144 . +PrcPot+Der/са
SFX 234 өү өүселәге/146 . +PrcPot+Der/дағы
SFX 234 өү өүселе/148 . +PrcPot+Der/лы
SFX 234 өү өүсеһеҙ/152 . +PrcPot+Abe
SFX 234 өү өүсегәсә/156 . +PrcPot+Der/ҡаса
SFX 234 өү өүсерәк . +PrcPot+Comp
SFX 234 өү өүҙәр/116 . +Act+Pl
SFX 234 өү өүҙөң/120 . +Act+Gen
SFX 234 өү өүгә/122 . +Act+Dat
SFX 234 өү өүгәрәк . +Act+Dat+Comp
SFX 234 өү өүҙө/122 . +Act+Acc
SFX 234 өү өүҙән/118 . +Act+Abl
SFX 234 өү өүҙә/122 . +Act+Loc
SFX 234 өү өүҙәрәк . +Act+Loc+Comp
SFX 234 өү өүмөн/129 . +Act+Pred1Sg
SFX 234 өү өүһөң/129 . +Act+Pred2Sg
SFX 234 өү өүбөҙ/133 . +Act+Pred1Pl
SFX 234 өү өүһөгөҙ/133 . +Act+Pred2Pl
SFX 234 өү өү/198 . +Act
