static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.dic
гөжгөү/234,100	[Verb]
көжгөү/234,100	[Verb]
өгөү/234,100	[Verb]
бөгөү/234,100	[Verb]
көйҙөгөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйөгөү/234,100	[Verb]
өҙлөгөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйлөгөү/234,100	[Verb]
сөйлөгөү/234,100	[Verb]
төйлөгөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөрлөгөү/234,100	[Verb]
абыныу-һөрлөгөү/234,100	[Verb]
дөмөгөү/234,100	[Verb]
көрөгөү/234,100	[Verb]
бөшөгөү/234,100	[Verb]
гөргөү/234,100	[Verb]
көргөү/234,100	[Verb]
өҙөү/234,100	[Verb]
өргөҙөү/234,100	[Verb]
йөҙөү/234,100	[Verb]
төҙөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөҙөү/234,100	[Verb]
гөжөү/234,100	[Verb]
мөжөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөжөү/234,100	[Verb]
көлөмйөү/234,100	[Verb]
мөнйөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйөү/234,100	[Verb]
көйөү/234,100	[Verb]
мөлкөйөү/234,100	[Verb]
шөкөйөү/234,100	[Verb]
сөйөү/234,100	[Verb]
төйөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөйөү/234,100	[Verb]
мөлкөү/234,100	[Verb]
шөңкөү/234,100	[Verb]
төкөү/234,100	[Verb]
өркөү/234,100	[Verb]
бөҫкөү/234,100	[Verb]
бөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
өҙөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөҙөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
төйөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
көлөү/234,100	[Verb]
төкөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
өймөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
мөңөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйрөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
өрөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
өлгөрөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
өрҙөрөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйөрөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
төйөрөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
дөмөктөрөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөрөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
бөрсөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
бөтөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
төкөтөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
төртөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
өшөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйгөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
дөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
көйөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
өркөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
йөлөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
йөрөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
ҡаҡырынып-төкөрөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
өшкөрөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
бөтөрөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
бешеренеү-төшөрөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
төпсөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
төнөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөртөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөйһөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
көрһөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
мөхөтһөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
өшөнөү/234,100	[Verb]
өңөү/234,100	[Verb]
бөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
гөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
дөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйөлдөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
көлдөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
төңөлдөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйөрөлдөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
көйөндөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
төрөндөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
өҙлөкһөндөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
төшөндөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
йөҙҙөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөҙҙөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
көйҙөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
төйҙөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
өрҙөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөрҙөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
йөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
төйөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
сөскөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
өшкөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
сөсөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
бөктөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйлөктөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөрлөктөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
көрөктөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
бөтөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
өттөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
өшөттөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
өшкөрттөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөрттөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
көлөштөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
йөрөштөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
төшөрөү/234,100	[Verb]
төпсөү/234,100	[Verb]
сөрсөү/234,100	[Verb]
шөйтөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйөлтөү/234,100	[Verb]
төйөлтөү/234,100	[Verb]
төңөлтөү/234,100	[Verb]
өрөлтөү/234,100	[Verb]
өтөү/234,100	[Verb]
гөжгөтөү/234,100	[Verb]
төҙөтөү/234,100	[Verb]
көлкөтөү/234,100	[Verb]
өркөтөү/234,100	[Verb]
өҫкөтөү/234,100	[Verb]
өшкөтөү/234,100	[Verb]
көрпөтөү/234,100	[Verb]
сөсөтөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөрһөтөү/234,100	[Verb]
өҙгөртөү/234,100	[Verb]
көлдөртөү/234,100	[Verb]
йөҙҙөртөү/234,100	[Verb]
көйҙөртөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйөртөү/234,100	[Verb]
төкөртөү/234,100	[Verb]
сөскөртөү/234,100	[Verb]
өшкөртөү/234,100	[Verb]
бөтөртөү/234,100	[Verb]
көттөртөү/234,100	[Verb]
төшөртөү/234,100	[Verb]
йөйөкһөү/234,100	[Verb]
өбөрһөү/234,100	[Verb]
өкшөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйөгөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөрлөгөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
көрөгөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
төҙөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
сөйөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
өйкөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
өркөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
өҙөлөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
көлөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
өңөлөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
төшөнөлөү/234,100	[Verb]
көйөнөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
көрһөнөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
бөрөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
көлдөрөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
сөскөрөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
төрөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
шөрөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
төпсөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
өтөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
йөрөтөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
көлдөртөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
һөртөшөү/234,100	[Verb]
